test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-i_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - syergi: # ok JYELGI
    syergi+N+Sg+Nom:   syerˊgi
    syergi+N+Sg+Gen:   syergi
    syergi+N+Sg+Acc:   syergi
    syergi+N+Sg+Ill:   suárgán
    syergi+N+Sg+Loc:   syergist
    syergi+N+Sg+Com:   suorˊgijn
    syergi+N+Sg+Abe:   syeˊrgittáá
    syergi+N+Ess:      syerˊgin
    syergi+N+Par:      syerˊgid
    syergi+N+Pl+Nom:   syergih
    syergi+N+Pl+Gen:  [suorgij, suoˊrgij]
    syergi+N+Pl+Acc:   suorgijd
    syergi+N+Pl+Ill:   suorˊgijd
    syergi+N+Pl+Loc:   suorgijn
    syergi+N+Pl+Com:   suoˊrgijguin
    syergi+N+Pl+Abe:   suoˊrgijttáá

  Noun - lyevdi: # ok JYELGI
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Nom:   lyevˊdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Gen:   lyevdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Acc:   lyevdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Ill:   luávdán
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Loc:   lyevdist
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Com:   luovˊdijn
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Abe:   lyeˊvdittáá
    lyevdi+N+Ess:      lyevˊdin
    lyevdi+N+Par:      lyevˊdid
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Nom:   lyevdih
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Gen:  [luovdij, luoˊvdij]
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Acc:   luovdijd
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Ill:   luovˊdijd
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Loc:   luovdijn
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Com:   luoˊvdijguin
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Abe:   luoˊvdijttáá

  Noun - kyeli: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom: kyeḷi
    kyeli+N+Sg+Gen: kyeˊle
    kyeli+N+Sg+Acc: kyeˊle
    kyeli+N+Sg+Ill: kuáḷán
    kyeli+N+Sg+Loc: kyeˊleest
    kyeli+N+Sg+Com: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Sg+Abe: kyeˊlettáá
    kyeli+N+Ess: kyellin
    kyeli+N+Par: kyellid
    kyeli+N+Pl+Nom: kyeˊleh
    kyeli+N+Pl+Gen: [kuolij, kuoˊlij]
    kyeli+N+Pl+Acc: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Ill: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Loc: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Pl+Com: kuoˊlijguin
    kyeli+N+Pl+Abe: kuoˊlijttáá

  Noun - äšši: # ok CAACI
    äšši+N+Sg+Nom:   äšši
    äšši+N+Sg+Gen:   ääṣ̌i
    äšši+N+Sg+Acc:   ääṣ̌i
    äšši+N+Sg+Ill:   ááṣ̌án
    äšši+N+Sg+Loc:   ääṣ̌ist
    äšši+N+Sg+Com:   aššijn
    äšši+N+Sg+Abe:   äˊṣ̌ittáá
    äšši+N+Ess:      äššin
    äšši+N+Par:      äššid
    äšši+N+Pl+Nom:   ääṣ̌ih
    äšši+N+Pl+Gen:  [aaṣ̌ij, aˊṣ̌ij]
    äšši+N+Pl+Acc:   aaṣ̌ijd
    äšši+N+Pl+Ill:   aššijd
    äšši+N+Pl+Loc:   aaṣ̌ijn
    äšši+N+Pl+Com:   aˊšijguin
    äšši+N+Pl+Abe:   aˊšijttáá

  Noun - čääci: # ok CAACI
    čääci+N+Sg+Nom:   čääci
    čääci+N+Sg+Gen:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Acc:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Ill:   čáácán
    čääci+N+Sg+Loc:   čääsist
    čääci+N+Sg+Com:   čassijn
    čääci+N+Sg+Abe:   čäˊsittáá
    čääci+N+Ess:      čääccin
    čääci+N+Par:      čääccid
    čääci+N+Pl+Nom:   čääsih
    čääci+N+Pl+Gen:  [čaasij, čaˊsij]
    čääci+N+Pl+Acc:   čaasijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Ill:   čassijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Loc:   čaasijn
    čääci+N+Pl+Com:   čaˊsijguin
    čääci+N+Pl+Abe:   čaˊsijittáá

  Noun - njäähi: # ok CAACI
    njäähi+N+Sg+Nom:   njäähi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Gen:   njääṿi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Ill:   njááhán
    njäähi+N+Sg+Loc:   njääṿist
    njäähi+N+Sg+Com:   njavvijn
    njäähi+N+Sg+Abe:   njäˊṿittáá
    njäähi+N+Ess:      njäähhin
    njäähi+N+Par:      njäähhin
    njäähi+N+Pl+Nom:   njääṿih
    njäähi+N+Pl+Gen:  [njaaṿij, njaˊṿij]
    njäähi+N+Pl+Acc:   njaaṿijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Ill:   njavvijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Loc:   njaaṿijn
    njäähi+N+Pl+Com:   njaˊvijguin
    njäähi+N+Pl+Abe:   njaˊvijttáá
